Connecticut, session 2026, SB00030.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to reduce noneducation aid to
the city of Hartford by an amount equal to the debt service paid by the
state on behalf of the city under a contract for financial assistance made
pursuant to section 7-576j of the general statutes.